Illinois, session 104th, HB4555.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Sections 6-5 and 6-25 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/6-5)7    Sec. 6-5. Appointed boards of review. In counties under 8township organization with less than 3,000,000 inhabitants in 9which no board of review is elected under Section 6-35, there 10shall be an appointed board of review to review the 11assessments made by the supervisor of assessments. When there 12is no existing appointed board of review, the chairman of the 13county board shall appoint, with approval of the county board, 143 citizens of the State county to comprise the board of review 15for that county, 2 to serve for a one-year one year term 16commencing on the following June 1, and one to serve for a 172-year 2 year term commencing on the same date. When an 18appointed board of review already exists, successors shall be 19appointed and qualified to serve for terms of 2 years 20commencing on June 1 of the year of appointment and until their 21successors are appointed and qualified. Vacancies shall be 22filled in like manner as original appointments, for the 23balance of the unexpired term. Members of the county board may   HB4555- 2 -LRB104 16376 HLH 29764 b1be appointed to the board of review. A member of the board of 2review may be reappointed. No person may serve on the board of 3review who is not qualified by experience and training in 4property appraisal and property tax administration.5(Source: P.A. 86-905; 87-1189; 88-455.) 6    (35 ILCS 200/6-25)7    Sec. 6-25. Additional members. In counties with a board of 8review appointed under Section 6-5, when the county board 9declares by resolution that the number of complaints filed 10with the board of review has created an emergency situation 11and caused a need for an expanded board of review, the chairman 12of the county board may appoint additional qualified members 13to the board of review for the sole purpose of holding separate 14hearings on complaints. The additional members shall not take 15part in the intracounty equalization process of the board of 16review under Section 16-60 or Section 16-65. If a board of 17review is expanded under this Section in Lake, DuPage, 18McHenry, or Kane County, then the chairman of that county 19board may appoint qualified residents of counties that are 20directly adjacent to that chairman's county to serve as 21additional members of the expanded board of review.22(Source: P.A. 96-825, eff. 11-25-09.) 23    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 24becoming law.